Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-1101
Planning department; commission; planning director; employees.

In any city of the primary class there shall be created a planning department, which shall consist of a city planning commission, a planning director, and such subordinate employees as are required to administer the planning program hereinafter set forth. The planning director shall serve as the secretary of the city planning commission and as the administrative head of the planning department.

Laws 1959, c. 46, § 1, p. 228.